Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-194
Odometers; motor vehicle dealer; duties;
violation; effect.

No licensed motor vehicle dealer shall
have in his or her possession as inventory for sale any used motor vehicle
of an age of less than twenty-five years for which the dealer does not have
in his or her possession the transferor's statement required by section 60-192
unless a certificate of title has been issued for such motor vehicle in the
name of the dealer. Violation of sections 60-190 to 60-196 shall be grounds
for suspension or revocation of a motor vehicle dealer's license under the Motor Vehicle Industry Regulation Act.

Laws 2005, LB 276, § 94;

Laws 2010, LB816, § 6.

Motor Vehicle Industry Regulation Act, see section 60-1401.